South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3653.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 61, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-61-125. (A) Every ambulance operating in the State pursuant to this chapter must be equipped with a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors and must be staffed by at least one emergency medical technician or attendant certified to administer an epinephrine auto-injector. The provisions of this subsection do not supersede or affect the application or interpretation of any federal or state guidance, law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary regarding ambulance staffing levels. (B) The Department of Public Health may promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. (C) For purposes of this section, "epinephrine auto-injector" means a single-use device used for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----